test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_kaamuv_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# This yaml is for contraction stems -uv (in North Saami these are 3-syllabic; as you see in Aanaar Saami there are still some forms left from the former 3-syllabic system)

  Noun - kaamuv: # ok, MLO; cons gradation m:mm
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Nom: kaamuv
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Gen: kammuu
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Acc: kammuu
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Ill: kammui
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Loc: kammust
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Com: kammuin
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Abe: kammuuttáá
    kaamuv+N+Ess: kaṃuvin
    kaamuv+N+Par: kaṃuvid
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Nom: kammuuh
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Gen: kammui
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Acc: kammuid
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Ill: kammuid
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Loc: kammuin
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Com: kammuiguin
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Abe: kammuittáá

  Noun - peenuv: # ok, MLO; cons gradation n:nn
    peenuv+N+Sg+Nom: peenuv
    peenuv+N+Sg+Gen: pennuu
    peenuv+N+Sg+Acc: pennuu
    peenuv+N+Sg+Ill: pennui
    peenuv+N+Sg+Loc: pennust # pennâgist a well-known rare variant; must be accepted
    peenuv+N+Sg+Com: pennuin
    peenuv+N+Sg+Abe: pennuuttáá
    peenuv+N+Ess: peṇuvin # also pennâgin must be accepted
    peenuv+N+Par: peṇuvid # also pennâgid must be accepted
    peenuv+N+Pl+Nom: pennuuh
    peenuv+N+Pl+Gen: pennui
    peenuv+N+Pl+Acc: pennuid
    peenuv+N+Pl+Ill: pennuid
    peenuv+N+Pl+Loc: pennuin
    peenuv+N+Pl+Com: pennuiguin
    peenuv+N+Pl+Abe: pennuittáá

  Noun - poovij: # ok, MLO - see also puáhháán-yaml with an odd mixed paradigm; here cons gradation v7:hh
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Nom: pooṿij
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Gen: puáhˊháá
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Acc: puáhˊháá
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Ill: puáhˊhái
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Loc: puáhˊhást
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Com: puáhˊháin
    poovij+v1+N+Sg+Abe: puáhˊhááttáá
    poovij+v1+N+Ess: puáˊhánin
    poovij+v1+N+Par: puáˊhánid
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Nom: puáhˊhááh
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Gen: puáhˊhái
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Acc: puáhˊháid
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Ill: puáhˊháid
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Loc: puáhˊháin
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Com: puáhˊháiguin
    poovij+v1+N+Pl+Abe: puáhˊháittáá
